Mississippi, session 2026, HB1029.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MISSISSIPPI: SECTION 1. (1)  This act shall be known and may be cited as the "Volunteer Firefighter Certification Act". (2)  (a)  The Legislature finds that volunteer firefighters across Mississippi undergo training that meets or exceeds NFPA 1010, Standard for Professional Qualifications for Firefighters. (b)  Recognition of such training is essential for workforce development, interagency cooperation and public safety advancement. (c)  It is the purpose of this act to ensure that qualified volunteer firefighters may receive state professional firefighter certification equal to that of career firefighters. (3)  (a)  The State Fire Academy, in consultation with the Office of the State Fire Marshal, shall establish a process to verify volunteer firefighter completion of NFPA 1010-compliant training. (b)  Upon verification, volunteer firefighters who have completed NFPA 1010-compliant training shall be eligible to receive state-issued Firefighter I and Firefighter II certifications from the State Fire Academy. (c)  Certification shall not alter the volunteer's employment status or compensation structure, but shall qualify the volunteer for reciprocity and professional recognition under state and national standards. (3)  (a)  The State Fire Academy shall maintain a registry of certified volunteer firefighters. (b)  No additional fee beyond standard certification processing shall be imposed on volunteer firefighters seeking certification. (c)  The State Fire Academy may promulgate rules necessary to implement this section. Implementation shall be accomplished within existing resources of the State Fire Academy and the Department of Insurance. SECTION 2.  Section 45-11-253, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 45-11-253.  The board shall: (a)  Establish minimum educational and training standards for fire personnel. (b)  Certify persons as being qualified under Sections 45-11-251 and 45-11-253 to be fire personnel. (c)  Revoke certifications for cause and in the manner provided in Sections 45-11-251 and 45-11-253. (d)  Establish minimum curriculum requirements for basic and advanced courses and programs for schools operated by or for the state or any political subdivision thereof for the specific purpose of training fire personnel. (e)  Make recommendations concerning any matter within its purview. (f)  Make such inspection and evaluation as may be necessary to determine if governmental units are complying with Sections 45-11-251 and 45-11-253 at cost to those units. (g)  Approve fire training schools for operation by or for the state or any political subdivision thereof for the specific purpose of training personnel. (h)  Upon the request of agencies, conduct surveys or aid municipalities and counties to conduct surveys at cost to those agencies through qualified public or private agencies and assist in the implementation of any recommendations resulting from such surveys. (i)  Upon request of training agencies, conduct general and specific management surveys and studies of the operations of the requesting agencies at cost to those agencies.  The role of the board under this subsection shall be that of consultant. (j)  Adopt and amend regulations consistent with law, for its internal management and control of board programs. (k)  Enter into contracts or do such things as may be necessary and incidental to the administration of Sections 45-11-251 and 45-11-253. (l)  Promulgate rules and regulations for the administration of Sections 45-11-251 and 45-11-253, including the authority to require the submission of reports and information by fire service agencies. SECTION 3.  This act shall take effect and be in force from and after July 1, 2026.